Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-129
Disconnection of property from corporate limits of city; procedure.

Whenever any person or persons owning any real property within and adjacent to the corporate limits of any city of the first class desire to have such property disconnected from the city, they may file a request with the city council asking that such territory be detached. The request shall contain the legal description of the property sought to be detached. If the city council determines that the property meets the requirements of this section and that part or all thereof ought to be detached, it shall by a majority vote of its members order such property detached from the city. A certified copy of such order shall be filed by the city clerk in the office of the register of deeds.

Laws 1971, LB 478, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 16.